Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB842.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1102-C.7. Deductions.--(a) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, if there is a transfer of residential property to a buyer collecting Supplemental Security Income benefits or with a household income not greater than 215% of the Federal poverty level, an amount equal to the tax paid at the time of transfer shall be deductible from the taxable income 123456789101112131415161718192021 of the buyer.(b) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, if there is a transfer of residential property to a buyer for use as a primary residence for a purchase price not greater than 80% of the median purchase price of a residential property in the county in which the transfer is completed, an amount equal to the tax paid at the time of transfer shall be deductible from the taxable income of the buyer and the taxable income of the seller.(c) For the purpose of establishing the median purchase price of a residential property, each county office of the recorder of deeds shall submit to the department no later than January 31, 2026, and each January 31 thereafter, documentation establishing the median purchase price of a residential property for the preceding calendar year.(d) If the deduction allowed under this section is greater than the amount of tax due, no refund or carryover credit shall be allowed.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0842PN0872 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819